DI-152

DIAGNOSTICS -

VARIABLE GEARRATIO STEERING

DIASK-02

DTC

C 1561 / 61

Lock Mechanism Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the lock mechanism, it turns the warning light on, records
the DTC, and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
The system detects that the LG terminal volt i I t
y inal vo age is equa .o VGRS actuator
C1561/61 batteryvoltagex0.4 + 3V,orthatthe LGterminalvoltageis VGRSECU
outside the range of battery voltage x 0.6 + 3Vfori.2sec.
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DIAGNOSTICS - VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthe position ofthe VGRS ECU connectors.

CHECK:

Check that VGRS ECU connectors are properly connected to the ECU.

OK:
Connection is good.

@

tor is disconnected or is likely to be discon-

NGRTCC 1561/61 is detected because the connec-
nected. Connect the connector correctly.

IN-38).

2 [ Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector (See page

F17774

@

PREPARATION:
(@  Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the VGRS ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals MV and LGND of the
VGRS ECU connector.
OK:
1to 100 Q
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals MV and LGND of the
VGRS ECU and body ground.
OK:
No continuity

NG> Replace VGRS actuator.

Replace VGRS ECU.
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